test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-jahtjma_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - jahtʼma: # Verb jahtʼma 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     jahtʼma+V+Inf/mA: jahtʼma
     jahtʼma+V+Inf: jahtiq
     jahtʼma+V+Act+PrfPrc: jahtʼnuq
     jahtʼma+V+Pss+PrfPrc: [jahit, jahitu]

     jahtʼma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jahi
     jahtʼma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [jahit, jahidõq]
     jahtʼma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jahtʼ
     jahtʼma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: jahimiq
     jahtʼma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: jahitiq
     jahtʼma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: jahtʼvaq
     jahtʼma+V+Act+Ind+ConNegII: jahi
     jahtʼma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [jahe, jahtʼsõ]
     jahtʼma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [jahet, jahtʼsõt, jaheq, jahtʼsõq, jahedõq, jahtʼsõdõq]
     jahtʼma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [jahtõ, jahtʼsõ]
     jahtʼma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [jahemiq, jahtʼsõmiq]
     jahtʼma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [jahetiq, jahtʼsõtiq]
     jahtʼma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [jaheq, jahevaq, jahtʼsõq, jahtʼsõvaq]

     jahtʼma+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jahida
     jahtʼma+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jahitas

     jahtʼma+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: jahtʼva

     jahtʼma+V+Jus: jahtʼkuq
